src/morphology/affixes/classifiers.lexc
!! !!!Northern Haida verbal classifiesrs

!! There are appr 400 of these, they are pointed to a 
!! set of 150 verbs taking classifiers.

LEXICON CLASSIFIERS

       CL/Shape+: cl_shapes 	 ;
      CL/Manner+: cl_manner 	 ;
       CL/Human+: cl_human  	 ;
 CL/Descriptive+: cl_descriptive ;
       CL/Sound+: cl_sound 		 ;
       CL/Color+: cl_color 		 ;


LEXICON cl_shapes
cha  Classifier_Verbs "flexible 3D object" ;
dla  Classifier_Verbs "whole mammal" ;
gáng Classifier_Verbs "fluffy, dry mass" ;

LEXICON cl_manner
gab Classifier_Verbs "fast movement of a sharp object into something" ;
g̲a Classifier_Verbs "on ones back" ;


LEXICON cl_human
hlk̲ám Classifier_Verbs "short and pretty girl" ;
jah Classifier_Verbs "person who is untidy and fat" ;

LEXICON cl_descriptive
cháam Classifier_Verbs "relatively long and narrow cylindrical object" ;

LEXICON cl_sound
ál Classifier_Verbs "stylized high-pitched female laughter" ;
dab Classifier_Verbs "ound of a soft, heavy object striking" ;
cháam Classifier_Verbs "loud high-pitched voice" ; !only w/ CL+daga and CL+gangáang

LEXICON cl_color
dám Classifier_Verbs "be transparent, be translucent" ; !only w/ CL+dala
gáng Classifier_Verbs "pale color, pastel color" ; !only w/ CL+dala
hlgáw Classifier_Verbs "be transparent" ; !only w/ CL+dala

LEXICON Classifier_Verbs
« Classifier_Verbstems ;
